Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-628.03
Joint exercise of powers with electric cooperatives or corporations; authority.

The Legislature declares that it is in the public interest of the State of Nebraska that public power districts and public power and irrigation districts be empowered to participate jointly or in cooperation with one or more electric cooperatives or electric membership corporations organized under the laws of this state or any other state in the establishment and operation of facilities for the generation or transmission of electric power and energy located within or outside this state, for the production, storage, and distribution of hydrogen located within this state, or for the production and distribution of ethanol located within this state in order to achieve economies and efficiencies in meeting the future energy needs of the people of the State of Nebraska. In furtherance of such end and in addition to but not in substitution for any other powers granted such districts, each such district shall have and may exercise its power and authority to plan, finance, acquire, construct, own, operate, maintain, and improve electric generation or transmission facilities, hydrogen production, storage, or distribution facilities, or ethanol production or distribution facilities located in this state jointly and in cooperation with one or more electric cooperatives or electric membership corporations organized under the laws of this state or any other state, and each district shall have and may exercise such power and authority with respect to electric generation or transmission facilities located outside of this state jointly or in cooperation with one or more electric cooperatives or electric membership corporations organized under the laws of this state or any other state. The power granted under this section may be exercised with respect to any electric generation or transmission facilities, hydrogen production, storage, or distribution facilities, or ethanol production or distribution facilities jointly with the powers granted under any other provision of sections 18-412.07 to 18-412.09 and 70-628.02 to 70-628.04.

Laws 1975, LB 104, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 40;

Laws 1997, LB 658, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 139, § 9.